Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Contributions to Interstate Oil Compact Commission

§ 53-1-101.
Authority to contribute to interstate oil compact commission.

The State Oil and Gas Board may pay annually out of the funds of the board the annual membership dues payable to the Interstate Oil Compact Commission for the membership of the State of Mississippi in that organization. The State Oil and Gas Board may pay the reasonable and necessary travel expenses incurred by the members and staff of the State Oil and Gas Board and by the designee appointed by the Governor to the Interstate Oil Compact Commission for travel to meetings of the commission to the extent those expenses are payable by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1950, ch. 217 § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 378; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 29; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 29; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 29; Laws, 1997, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.